Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 31 Dogs and Cats

Cross references. —

As to larceny generally, see §

6-3-402

et seq.

As to powers of municipal corporations generally relative to dogs, see title 15.

As to use of dogs to hunt big or trophy game animal, see §

23-3-109

.

As to killing of dogs that have injured big or trophy game animals, see §

23-3-109

.